Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of  this 2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 294.305 to
294.565.
SECTION 2. (1) If the voters of a municipal corporation  approve the issuance of general
obligation bonds at a May election, the  budget of the municipal corporation adopted under
ORS 294.456 or a supplemental budget adopted under  ORS 294.471 may include estimated re-
quirements to pay debt  service on the bonds during the ensuing year or each of the years
of the ensuing budget period.
(2) On or after July 1 and before September 15 following  the election described in sub-
section (1) of this section, the governing  body of the municipal corporation may adopt an
ordinance or resolution imposing and categorizing a tax levy necessary to pay  the estimated
debt service on the bonds described in subsection (1) of this section. The  portion of an ordi-
nance or resolution that is adopted under this subsection does not become effective until  the
debt is incurred.
(3) The assessor of the county in which the municipal  corporation is located shall accept
a written notice certifying the estimated amount of ad valorem property taxes to be  imposed
by the municipal corporation  pursuant to an ordinance or resolution adopted under sub-
section (2) of this section, or of a subsequent ordinance or resolution imposing  and categor-
izing a tax levy in an amount that is less than the amount imposed under subsection (2) of
this section, on or before September 15 of  the property tax year, provided the governing body
of the municipal corporation timely files for an extension under ORS 310.060.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 294.471 is amended to read:
294.471. (1) Notwithstanding  requirements as to estimates of and limitation on expenditures,
during the fiscal year or budget  period for which the original budget was adopted, the governing
body of a municipal corporation may make one or more supplemental  budgets under any of the fol-
lowing  circumstances:
(a) An  occurrence or condition that is not ascertained when preparing the original budget or a
previous supplemental budget  for the current year or current budget period and that requires a
change in financial planning.
Enrolled House Bill 2278 (HB 2278-A) Page 1
(b) A  pressing necessity that could not reasonably be foreseen when preparing the original
budget or a previous supplemental budget for the current year or current budget period  and that
requires prompt action.
(c) Funds that are made available by another unit of federal, state or local  government and the
availability of which could not reasonably be foreseen when  preparing the original budget or a
previous supplemental budget for the current year or current budget period.
(d) A request for services or facilities the cost of which  is to be supplied by a private individual,
corporation or company or by another governmental unit and the amount of  which could not be
accurately  estimated  when preparing the original budget or a previous supplemental budget for the
current year or current budget period.
(e) Proceeds from the involuntary destruction, involuntary conversion, or sale of  property that
necessitates the immediate purchase, construction or acquisition of different facilities in  order to
carry on governmental operations.
(f) Ad valorem property taxes that are received during the fiscal year or budget period in  an
amount sufficiently greater than the amount estimated  to be collected such that the difference will
significantly affect the level of government operations to be funded by the taxes as  provided in the
original budget or a previous supplemental budget for the current year or current budget period.
(g) A local  option tax described in ORS 294.476 that is certified for extension on the assessment
and tax roll under ORS 310.060 for the fiscal year or budget period in  which the local option tax
measure is approved by voters.
(h) A reduction in available resources  that requires the governing body to reduce appropriations
in the original budget or a previous supplemental budget for the current year or  current budget
period.
(i) The original budget of  the municipal corporation adopted under ORS 294.456 did not
include estimated requirements to pay debt service pursuant to section 2 of this  2017 Act or
the actual requirements are different from the  estimated requirements included in the ori-
ginal budget or a previous supplemental budget.
(2) A supplemental budget may not extend beyond the end of the fiscal year or  budget period
during which it is submitted.
(3)(a) If the amended estimated  expenditures contained in an individual fund that is being
changed by a supplemental budget differ by 10 percent or  less from the expenditures in the budget
as most recently amended  prior to the supplemental budget, the governing body of the municipal
corporation may adopt the supplemental budget at a regular meeting of the governing body.
(b) Notice of  a regular meeting convened pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection, including
a statement that  a supplemental budget will be considered at the meeting, must be published not less
than five days before the meeting.
(c) Additional expenditures contained in a supplemental budget described in this subsection  may
not be made unless  the governing body of the municipal corporation enacts appropriation ordinances
or resolutions authorizing the expenditures. The  ordinances or resolutions must state the need for
and the purpose and amount of the appropriation.
(4) Except as provided in ORS 294.476, the making of a supplemental budget does not  authorize
the governing body to increase  the municipal corporation’s total ad valorem property taxes above
the amount  or rate published with the regular budget and certified to the assessor under ORS
310.060 in conjunction with the regular budget  for the fiscal year or for each fiscal year of the
budget period to which the supplemental budget applies.
SECTION 4.  ORS 294.316 is amended to read:
294.316. The provisions of  ORS 294.305 to 294.565 do not apply to the following municipal cor-
porations and entities:
(1) Drainage districts organized under ORS chapter 547;
(2) District improvement companies organized under ORS chapter 554;
(3) Highway lighting districts organized under ORS chapter 372;
(4) Irrigation districts organized under ORS chapter 545;
Enrolled House Bill 2278 (HB 2278-A) Page 2
(5) Road districts organized under ORS chapter 371;
(6) Soil and water conservation districts organized under ORS  chapter 568 that will not levy an
ad valorem tax during the ensuing year or ensuing budget period;
(7) Municipal public utilities operating under separate boards or commissions, authorized  under
ORS chapter 225 and city charters, and people’s utility districts organized under  ORS chapter 261,
both operating without ad valorem tax support during the ensuing year or ensuing budget period;
(8) Housing authorities [ organized under ORS 446.515 to 446.547 and ORS  chapter 456 ] created
under ORS 456.055  to 456.235  that are not carrying out urban renewal activities using a division
of ad valorem taxes under ORS 457.440 during the ensuing year or ensuing budget period;
(9) Water control districts organized  under ORS chapter 553 that will not levy an ad valorem
tax during the ensuing year or ensuing budget period;
(10) Hospital financing authorities organized under ORS 441.525 to 441.595;
(11) Export trading corporations organized under ORS 777.755 to 777.800;
(12) Diking districts organized under ORS chapter 551;
(13) Health districts organized under ORS 440.315 to 440.410; [ and]
(14) Intergovernmental entities created under ORS 190.010, including councils of  governments
described in ORS 294.900 to 294.930, except that an intergovernmental entity or a council of  gov-
ernments that proposes to impose ad valorem property  taxes for the ensuing year or budget period
is subject to ORS 294.305 to 294.565 for the budget prepared for that year or period[ .]; and
(15) Historic ghost towns as defined in ORS 221.862.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 294.456 is amended to read:
294.456. (1)(a) After the public  hearing required under ORS 294.453 (1) and consideration of
matters discussed at the public hearing, the governing body of a  municipal corporation shall enact
the ordinances or resolutions necessary to adopt the budget, to  make the appropriations, to deter-
mine, make and declare the ad valorem  property tax amount or rate to be certified to the assessor
for either the ensuing year or each of the years of the ensuing budget period  and to itemize and
categorize the ad valorem property tax amount or rate as required under ORS 310.060.
(b) The  governing body may amend the budget estimates and proposed ad valorem property tax
amount or rate in the budget document  before adoption under paragraph (a) of this subsection and
after adoption if the  post-adoption amendments are adopted prior to the commencement of the fiscal
year or budget period to which the budget relates.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph  (b) of this subsection, unless the amended budget document is
republished pursuant to ORS 294.438 or 294.448 in the  same manner as the original budget and an-
other public hearing is held pursuant to ORS 294.453 (1), or except to the extent ad  valorem prop-
erty taxes may be increased under ORS 294.476:
(A) The amount of estimated expenditures for each fund in an annual budget may not  be in-
creased by more than $5,000 or 10 percent of the estimated expenditures, whichever is greater;
(B) The amount of estimated  expenditures for each fund in a biennial budget may not be in-
creased by more than $10,000 or 10 percent of the estimated expenditures, whichever is  greater; and
(C) The amount or rate of the total ad  valorem property taxes to be certified by the municipal
corporation to the assessor may not exceed the amount approved by the budget committee.
(2)(a) After  a public hearing under ORS 294.453 (2) or (3), receipt of the certification of the tax
supervising and conservation commission, if required, and  consideration of any orders, recommen-
dations or  objections made by the tax supervising and conservation commission in accordance with
law, the governing  body of a municipal corporation shall enact the ordinances or resolutions nec-
essary to adopt the budget, to make the  appropriations, to determine, make and declare the ad
valorem property tax amount or rate for either the ensuing fiscal  year or each of the fiscal years
of the ensuing budget period and to itemize and categorize the  ad valorem property tax amount or
rate as required under ORS 310.060.
(b) The action  taken by the governing body under paragraph (a) of this subsection on each or-
der, recommendation or objection made by the commission, with the  reasons for the action, must
be included in the ordinance or resolution adopting the budget.
Enrolled House Bill 2278 (HB 2278-A) Page 3
(c) The governing body shall send a certified copy of the ordinance or resolution  to the com-
mission within 15 days after the date the ordinance or resolution is adopted.
(d) The governing body may amend the budget estimates,  appropriations and ad valorem prop-
erty tax amount or rate in the budget document before adoption  under paragraph (a) of this sub-
section and after adoption if the post-adoption amendments are adopted prior  to the commencement
of the fiscal year or budget period to which the budget relates.
(e) Notwithstanding paragraph  (d) of this subsection, unless the amended budget document is
resubmitted to the tax supervising and conservation commission for  another public hearing and for
recommendations or objections of the commission, or except  to the extent ad valorem property taxes
may be increased under ORS 294.476:
(A) The amount  of estimated expenditures for each fund in an annual budget may not be in-
creased by more than $5,000 or 10 percent of the estimated expenditures, whichever is greater;
(B) The amount of estimated expenditures for each fund in a biennial budget  may not be in-
creased by more than $10,000 or 10 percent of the estimated expenditures, whichever is  greater; and
(C) The amount or rate of the total ad valorem  property taxes to be certified by the municipal
corporation to the assessor may not exceed the amount approved by the budget committee.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of  this section, the appropriations required
under subsections (1) and (2) of this section must contain:
(A) One amount for each organizational unit or program of each fund  that is the total of all
amounts for  personnel services, materials and services and capital outlay attributable to the or-
ganizational unit or program; and
(B) Separate amounts  in each fund for operating expenses for personnel services, materials and
services and capital outlay that cannot be allocated  to a particular organizational unit or program
and for debt service, special payments, interfund revenue transfers and operating contingencies.
(b) Separate amounts for activities within an organizational unit or  program may be appropri-
ated separately.
(c) For a municipal corporation to which the terms “organizational unit” and  “program” do not
apply, the appropriations must contain separate amounts for personnel services, materials  and ser-
vices,  capital  outlay, debt service, special payments, interfund revenue transfers and operating con-
tingencies for each fund.
(4) For  a school district or an education service district, the appropriations required under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section must contain separate amounts in  each major fund for each
major function, as prescribed by the Department of Education  in consultation with the Department
of Revenue, including instruction, support services, enterprise and community services,  facilities
acquisition and construction, interfund revenue transfers, debt service and operating contingencies.
(5) For a community college district,  the appropriations required under subsections (1) and (2)
of this section must contain separate amounts in each fund for:
(a) Each major function, as  prescribed by the Office of Community Colleges and Workforce De-
velopment in consultation  with the Department of Revenue, including instruction, instructional
support, student services, community services, college support services, interfund transfers,  debt
service and operating contingencies;
(b) Each major function as required under subsection (4) of this section; or
(c) Each organizational unit or  program [ or] and each object classification required under
subsection (3) of this section.
(6) Except as provided in ORS 294.338, 294.463, 294.466,  294.471, 294.473 and 294.478, after the
governing body has enacted the ordinances or resolutions necessary to adopt the  budget as required
under this section, an expenditure, or encumbrance if encumbrance  accounting is used, of public
money may not be made for any purpose in an amount greater than the amount appropriated.
(7) The governing body  of a municipal corporation shall record the amount or rate of ad valorem
property taxes to be certified and the purposes for  which the taxes will be used. Except as provided
in ORS 294.476, the  municipal corporation may not certify ad valorem property taxes in an amount
or rate greater than the amount or rate recorded for the purposes indicated.
Enrolled House Bill 2278 (HB 2278-A) Page 4
(8)(a) The governing body of a municipal corporation shall determine, make and  declare ad
valorem property taxes under subsections (1) and (2) of this section as  a rate per $1,000 of assessed
value if the taxes  are operating taxes as defined in ORS 310.055 (1) or rate-based local option taxes.
(b) The governing body shall determine, make  and declare ad valorem property taxes under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section as an amount if the taxes are  certified as amount-based local
option  taxes,  to pay principal and interest on exempt bonded indebtedness or to pay other govern-
ment obligations described in [ section 11  (5),] Article XI , section 11 (5),  of the Oregon Constitution.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph  (a) of this subsection, the governing body may certify operating
taxes as defined in ORS  310.055 (1) as a rate or an amount if less than the full authority is needed
to balance the fund that will receive the taxes.
SECTION 6.  ORS 199.743 is amended to read:
199.743. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 294.305 to [ 294.520] 294.565 and 310.010 to 310.110, if the
charter for a city-county  is approved under ORS 199.740 (1) and the effective date of such charter
is other  than the date of the beginning of the fiscal year immediately following the fiscal year in
progress on the effective date of such  charter, during the remainder of the fiscal year in progress
on the effective date of such charter the city-county shall expend moneys and levy taxes in accord-
ance with the budgets prepared and adopted by each of the  municipal corporations consolidated,
merged or dissolved in the formation of the city-county pursuant  to such charter, as if such charter
had not taken effect. For the purposes of this section, the city-county shall be considered  to be a
continuation of each municipal corporation consolidated,  merged or dissolved in the formation of the
city-county.
(2) As used in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) “Fiscal year” has the meaning given that term in ORS 294.311.
(b) “Municipal corporation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 294.311.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 261.200 is amended to read:
261.200. (1) If a majority  of votes cast at the election favors formation of the people’s utility
district and authorization of the district to impose  a special levy for the purposes stated in the pe-
tition for formation, or  annexation of a parcel of territory or a city to an existing district, or con-
solidation of two or more districts, as the case may be,  and in conformity with provisions of ORS
261.105 and  261.110, the county governing body shall issue a proclamation accordingly and file a
certified copy with the county clerk of each  county where the district or any portion thereof is lo-
cated. The proclamation for formation of a district shall be in substantially the following form:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Whereas at an election duly and regularly held on  the day of , 2 , within
 County (or  Counties), State of Oregon, and within  the boundaries of a pro-
posed district as herein described, there was  submitted to the electors thereof the question whether
or not a people’s utility district should be incorporated as  the (here insert name of district) and to
give authority to impose a special levy of $  under and pursuant to the provisions of  ORS
chapter 261; and
Whereas at the election so held  votes were  cast in favor of incorporation, and  votes
were cast against incorporation; and
Whereas the incorporation of the (here insert name of district)  received the affirmative vote of
the majority of the votes cast at the election;
Now, therefore, the undersigned hereby does proclaim and declare that all of that  part of the
State of Oregon, described as (here insert description) has been duly and legally  incorporated as the
 People’s Utility District under and pursuant to the Constitution and laws of the State
of Oregon, and the district has the authority to collect the  sum of $  by special levy against
the taxable property within the district.
Chairperson of the County Governing Body.
By 
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Enrolled House Bill 2278 (HB 2278-A) Page 5
(2) The proclamation for annexing a  parcel of territory or a city to an existing district or the
consolidation of two or more existing districts, or  both, shall be adaptations of the above procla-
mation.
(3) The proclamation of formation,  with the notice of boundary change under ORS 308.225, shall
be filed by the district with the county assessor of each county in which  any portion of the district
is situated, who shall thereupon enter the special levy.
(4) Expenditure of the moneys received from the  special levy for the purposes stated in the pe-
tition for district formation may be made by the district without  prior adoption of a budget under
ORS 294.305 to [ 294.520] 294.565.
(5) Following proclamation of formation of a district, any person whose  property has been im-
properly included within a district, contrary to the provisions of ORS 261.110 (5)  or (7), may petition
a county governing body to revise the district boundaries to  exclude the property. After notice to
the district, and a hearing on the petition,  the county governing body shall revise the district
boundaries to exclude such property as it finds should not have been  included within the district
under the standards set forth in ORS 261.110 (5)  or (7). Upon such findings and boundary revisions
a district shall be permitted  to refund related taxes paid that are based upon assessments made after
January 1, 1978. Boundary revisions shall comply with ORS  308.225. The remedy provided in this
subsection shall be available only to persons owning property in districts which were  formed after
January 1, 1978.
SECTION 8.  ORS 294.175 is amended to read:
294.175. (1) As used in this section and ORS 294.178 to 294.187:
(a) “Department” means the Department of Revenue.
(b) “Expenditures” has  the meaning given the term for purposes of ORS 294.305 to [ 294.520]
294.565 and may be further defined by rule of the department. “Expenditures” does not include any
item or class of items that cannot reasonably be allocated to an organizational unit.
(c) “Expenditures for assessment and taxation” means expenditures for any of the activities,
functions or services required of a county  in the assessment, equalization, levy, collection or dis-
tribution of property taxes under  ORS chapters 305, 306, 307, 308, 308A, 309, 310, 311, 312 and 321.
“Expenditures  for  assessment and taxation” specifically includes expenditures for appraising
county-appraised industrial property, if the responsibility for making  the appraisal has been deleg-
ated by the department to a county assessor under ORS 306.126 (3).
(d) “Grant” has the meaning given the term for purposes of ORS 294.305  to [ 294.520] 294.565,
and is further described under ORS 294.178.
(2) On or  before May 1 of each year, each county shall file with the department a true copy of
its estimates of expenditures for assessment and taxation  for the ensuing year as prepared for pur-
poses of ORS 294.388 but in accordance with any rules adopted by the department.
(3) Upon receipt of the estimate, the department shall review the estimate to  determine its ad-
equacy  to  provide the resources needed to achieve compliance with ORS 308.232 and 308.234, ORS
chapter 309 and other laws requiring equality  and uniformity in the system of property taxation
within the county in order that the same equality and uniformity may  be achieved throughout the
state.
(4) If, upon initial  review of the estimate, the department determines that the proposed expend-
itures, or  any of them, are not at the level or of the type needed to achieve adequacy, the depart-
ment shall notify the  county governing body. The notice shall contain an explanation of the reasons
for the determination and may describe specific items or classifications of expenditure which  the
department has determined are required, or are not required,  in order to achieve adequacy. The
notice shall fix the date upon which a  conference with the county governing body or representatives
of the county governing body shall be held.
(5)(a) Subject to paragraph (b) of this subsection, if, upon initial  review, or upon or after con-
ference held on the date specified in the notice  under subsection (4) of this section, or another date
or dates convenient to the  department and the county governing body, the department determines
Enrolled House Bill 2278 (HB 2278-A) Page 6
that the expenditures as initially  filed, or that the expenditures as agreed upon at the conference,
are at the level and of the type needed to achieve adequacy for that year or  over a period of years
under a plan presented as described under ORS  294.181, the department shall certify to the county
governing body that  its estimate of expenditures for assessment and taxation so determined are ad-
equate and that the  county will be included in the computation made under ORS 294.178 for the
purpose of determining the amount of that county’s quarterly grant. The department  shall include
in the certification  an estimate of the percentage share of the funds available in the County As-
sessment Function Funding Assistance Account that the  county will receive under ORS 294.178 and
an estimate of the total amount of the grant that will be forthcoming  to the county from that ac-
count for the ensuing year on account of the certification.
(b) The department shall not certify expenditures under  this subsection that the department
determines are in excess of the expenditures necessary to  meet the requirements of subsection (3)
of this section.
(6) Any certification  issued under subsection (5) of this section shall be issued as of the June
15 following  the filing of the estimate of expenditures under subsection (2) of this section. If, as of
June 15, agreement has not been  reached between the department and the county governing body
upon the estimate, the department shall issue a denial of certification.
(7) A county may appeal the determination of the department under  subsection (5)(b) of this
section or the denial  of certification issued under subsection (6) of this section to the Director of
the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services. Appeal shall be filed within 10 days after the
date that the denial of certification is issued. The sole issue upon appeal shall be the  adequacy of
expenditures for assessment and taxation as  filed with the department under subsection (2) of this
section, and the determination, if any, made by  the department under subsection (5)(b) of this sec-
tion. If the Oregon Department of Administrative Services does not  issue an order approving the
expenditures before July  1 of the fiscal year for which the expenditures are proposed, the certif-
ication for purposes of ORS 294.175 to 294.187 shall be considered denied.
SECTION 9.  ORS 478.410 is amended to read:
478.410. (1)  To provide funds for defraying expenses for the establishment, equipment and main-
tenance of the district, the district board may provide for  a tax on the assessed value of all taxable
property within the district.
(2) To carry into effect any of the powers  granted to the district, the district, when authorized
by a majority of the voters voting at an election called for  that purpose, may borrow money and sell
and dispose of general obligation bonds. The total outstanding general obligation bonds, together
with liabilities outstanding incurred under rental or lease-purchase agreements authorized by sub-
section (3) of this section,  may not exceed one and one-fourth percent (0.0125) of the real market
value of all taxable property within the district, computed in accordance with ORS 308.207.
(3) The district board may enter into rental or lease-purchase agreements to rent,  lease or ac-
quire real or personal property, or both, required for fire-protection purposes. Except for agree-
ments to rent, lease or acquire real property, an agreement may not run for more than 10 years  or
be subject to renewal. The aggregate principal obligations under the  agreements, and under other
like agreements, with outstanding bonded indebtedness, may not exceed the limitation  imposed by
subsection (2) of this section. ORS 294.305  to [ 294.520] 294.565 do not affect or restrict the right of
any district to enter into an agreement described in this subsection.
(4) Unless expressly prohibited by the documents  creating the district, a district board may
adopt an ordinance as provided under ORS 198.510 to 198.600 to create a  fee for any service pro-
vided by the district.  A fee created under authority of this section may not exceed the cost to the
district of providing the service. The fee authority granted to a board by this subsection is in addi-
tion to any authority granted to a board under local law or by the documents creating the  district.
Notwithstanding ORS 198.600, the failure to pay a fee created  under authority of this section is not
a violation punishable under ORS 198.600.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 553.720 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2278 (HB 2278-A) Page 7
553.720. The ad valorem tax provided for in ORS 553.710 shall  be levied and collected in the
manner otherwise provided by law for the levy and  collection of [ real] property taxes. The board
shall prepare a budget in  the form, manner and time prescribed in ORS 294.305 to [ 294.520, 294.458
and] 294.565 (the Local Budget Law), for each subdistrict for which taxes are to  be levied and as-
sessed, and  in accordance therewith shall fix the amount of money to be raised by taxation for each
subdistrict. Thereafter the levy  shall be equalized and the tax collected and turned over to the dis-
trict as otherwise provided by law for public corporations.
SECTION 11.  ORS 568.806 is amended to read:
568.806. (1) When  authorized to become a taxing district by the eligible electors of the district
as provided  in ORS 568.807, a district may assess, levy and collect an ad valorem tax each year on
[the real  market value of ] all taxable property within the limits of the district. The proceeds of the
tax shall be applied in carrying out the purposes of ORS 568.210 to 568.808 and 568.900 to 568.933.
(2) In any year  in which the ad valorem tax provided for in subsection (1) of this section is
levied, the directors of the district shall prepare a budget  in the form, manner and time prescribed
in ORS 294.305 to [ 294.520] 294.565 (the Local Budget Law), and in accordance therewith shall fix
the amount of money to be raised by taxation for the district.
(3) Any taxes levied in any year shall be returned to the county officer, whose duty it is to  ex-
tend the tax roll in the manner provided in ORS 310.060.
(4) All taxes levied by a district shall become payable at the same time  and be collected by the
same officer who collects county taxes, and shall be turned over to the district according to  law.
The county officer whose duty it is to extend the county levy shall extend the  levy of the district
in the same manner as city taxes are extended.
(5) Property shall be subject to sale for nonpayment of taxes  levied by a district in like manner
and with like effect as in the case of county and state taxes.
SECTION 12.  ORS 294.476 is amended to read:
294.476. (1) This subsection applies to the period  following [ the] a municipal corporation’s
adoption under ORS 294.456 of a budget [ under ORS  294.456] that does not include revenue from
a proposed local option tax[ ,]. If [ a] the municipal corporation places a local option tax measure on
the ballot for an election held in September and the electors of the municipal  corporation approve
the measure, in order to impose the  local option tax during the current fiscal year or current budget
period , the governing body of the municipal corporation must:
(a) Adopt an ordinance or resolution  to determine, make and declare the local option tax and
to categorize the local option tax amount or rate as provided in ORS 310.060;
(b) Receive from the assessor of the county in  which the municipal corporation is located (or,
if the municipal corporation is located in more than one county, from the  assessor of each county
in which the  municipal corporation is located) written approval to file a supplemental notice of
property tax as described in ORS 310.060 (9); and
(c) File with the assessor of the county in  which the municipal corporation is located (or, if the
municipal corporation is located in more than  one county, with the assessor of each county in which
the municipal corporation is located) two copies of the ordinance or resolution described in para-
graph (a) of this subsection, two copies of the supplemental notice of  property tax required under
ORS 310.060 and two copies of the approved local option tax measure.
(2) This subsection applies to the period  following [ the] a municipal corporation’s  adoption
under ORS 294.456 of a  budget [ under ORS 294.456 ] that does not include revenue from a proposed
local option tax or taxes to pay principal and interest on exempt  bonded indebtedness[ ,]. If [ a] the
municipal corporation places a local option tax measure or a general obligation bond measure on
the ballot for an election, other than an election held  in September, next following adoption of the
budget and the electors of the municipal corporation approve  the measure, in order to impose the
tax during the  second fiscal year of a biennial budget period, the governing body of the municipal
corporation  must:
(a) Adopt an ordinance or resolution to determine,  make and declare the tax and to categorize
the tax amount or rate as provided in ORS 310.060; and
Enrolled House Bill 2278 (HB 2278-A) Page 8
(b) Include with the certification required  under ORS 310.060 for the second fiscal year of the
biennial budget period[ ,] two copies of the ordinance or resolution described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection and two copies of the  approved local option tax measure or general obligation bond
measure.
(3) Funds raised by  a local option tax described in this section may not be expended by the
municipal corporation unless the municipal  corporation has adopted a supplemental budget in ac-
cordance with ORS 294.471. Funds may be expended  only in accordance with the supplemental
budget so adopted.
(4) As soon as received, the county  assessor shall forward one copy of each of the documents
described in subsection (1)(c) of this section to the Department of Revenue.
SECTION 13. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House March 1, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 24, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2278 (HB 2278-A) Page 9